Mississippi statutes. Title 19. Counties and County Officers
Uniform System for Issuance of County Bonds

§ 19-9-1.
Purpose of bonds enumerated.

The board of supervisors of any county is authorized to issue negotiable bonds of the county to raise money for the following purposes:

Purchasing or erecting, equipping, repairing, reconstructing, remodeling and enlarging county buildings, courthouses, office buildings, jails, hospitals, nurses’ homes, health centers, clinics, and related facilities, and the purchase of land therefor;

Erecting, equipping, repairing, reconstructing, remodeling, or acquiring county homes for indigents, and purchasing land therefor;

Purchasing or constructing, repairing, improving and equipping buildings for public libraries and for purchasing land, equipment and books therefor, whether the title to same be vested in the county issuing such bonds or in some subdivision of the state government other than the county, or jointly in such county and other such subdivision;

Establishing county farms for convicts, purchasing land therefor, and erecting, remodeling, and equipping necessary buildings therefor;

Constructing, reconstructing, and repairing roads, highways and bridges, and acquiring the necessary land, including land for road building materials, acquiring rights-of-way therefor; and the purchase of heavy construction equipment and accessories thereto reasonably required to construct, repair and renovate roads, highways and bridges and approaches thereto within the county;

Erecting, repairing, equipping, remodeling or enlarging or assisting or cooperating with another county or other counties in erecting, repairing, equipping, remodeling, or enlarging buildings, and related facilities for an agricultural high school, or agricultural high school-junior college, including gymnasiums, auditoriums, lunchrooms, vocational training buildings, libraries, teachers’ homes, school barns, garages for transportation vehicles, and purchasing land therefor;

Purchasing or renting voting machines and any other election equipment to be used in elections held within the county;

Constructing, reconstructing or repairing boat landing ramps and wharves fronting on the Mississippi Sound or the Gulf of Mexico and on the banks or shores of the inland waters, levees, bays and bayous of any county bordering on the Gulf of Mexico or fronting on the Mississippi Sound, having two (2) municipalities located therein, each with a population in excess of twenty thousand (20,000) in accordance with the then last preceding federal census;

Assisting the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, the Office of General Services or any other state agency in acquiring a site for constructing suitable buildings and runways and equipping an airport for any state university or other state-supported four-year college now or hereafter in existence in such county;

Aiding and cooperating in the planning, undertaking, construction or operation of airports and air navigation facilities, including lending or donating money, pursuant to the provisions of the airport authorities law, being Sections 61-3-1 through 61-3-83, Mississippi Code of 1972, regardless of whether such airports or air navigation facilities are located in the county or counties issuing such bonds;

Establishing rubbish and garbage disposal systems in accordance with the provisions of Sections 19-5-17 through 19-5-27;

Defraying the expenses of projects of the county cooperative service district in which it is a participating county, regardless of whether the project is located in the county issuing such bonds;

Purchasing machinery and equipment which have an expected useful life in excess of ten (10) years. The life of such bonds shall not exceed the expected useful life of such machinery and equipment. Machinery and equipment shall not include any motor vehicle weighing less than twelve thousand (12,000) pounds;

Purchasing fire fighting equipment and apparatus, and providing housing for the same and purchasing land necessary therefor;

A project for which a certificate of public convenience and necessity has been obtained by the county pursuant to the Regional Economic Development Act;

Constructing dams or low-water control structures on lakes or bodies of water under the provisions of Section 19-5-92;

For the purposes provided for in Section 57-75-37.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 311; 1906, § 331; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3704; 1930, § 247; 1942, § 2926-01; Laws, 1904, ch. 140; Laws, 1912, ch. 234; Laws, 1932, ch. 204; Laws, 1950, ch. 241, § 1; Laws, 1954, ch. 360, § 27; Laws, 1956, ch. 198; Laws, 1957 Ex Sess Ch. 13, § 5; Laws, 1966, ch. 293, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 284; Laws, 1973, ch. 446, § 1; Laws, 1982, ch. 441; Laws, 1989, ch. 519, § 9; Laws, 1990, ch. 542, § 1; Laws, 2000, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 46; Laws, 2001, ch. 476, § 3; Laws, 2005, ch. 315, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 14, 2005.).

§ 19-9-3.
Bonds of roads or supervisors districts.

[With regard to any county that is exempt from the provisions of Section 19-2-3, this section shall read as follows:]

The board of supervisors of any county is authorized to issue negotiable bonds of any road district or supervisors district within any such county to raise money for the purpose of constructing, reconstructing, and repairing roads, highways and bridges, and acquiring the necessary land, including land for building materials, and rights-of-way therefor.

The board of supervisors of any county designated in paragraph (h) of Section 19-9-1 is authorized to issue negotiable bonds of any supervisors district or districts in such county to raise money for the purposes described in paragraph (h) of Section 19-9-1.

All bonds issued pursuant to this section shall be issued in like manner and be subject to the same limitations and provisions as are set forth in Sections 19-9-1 through 19-9-31 with reference to the issuance of county bonds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 311; 1906, § 331; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3704; 1930, § 247; 1942, §§ 2926-01, 2926-02; Laws, 1904, ch. 140; Laws, 1912, ch. 234; Laws, 1932, ch. 204; Laws, 1950, ch. 241, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1954, ch. 360, § 27; Laws, 1956, ch. 198; Laws, 1957 Ex Sess, ch 13, § 5; Laws, 1966, ch. 293, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 284; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess ch. 14, § 11, eff from and after October 1, 1989.

§ 19-9-3.
Bonds of roads or supervisors districts.

[With regard to any county that is required to operate on a countywide system of road administration as described in Section 19-2-3, this section shall read as follows:]

The board of supervisors of any county designated in paragraph (h) of Section 19-9-1 is authorized to issue negotiable bonds of any supervisors district or districts in such county to raise money for the purposes described in paragraph (h) of Section 19-9-1.

All bonds issued pursuant to this section shall be issued in like manner and be subject to the same limitations and provisions as are set forth in Sections 19-9-1 through 19-9-31 with reference to the issuance of county bonds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 311; 1906, § 331; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3704; 1930, § 247; 1942, §§ 2926-01, 2926-02; Laws, 1904, ch. 140; Laws, 1912, ch. 234; Laws, 1932, ch. 204; Laws, 1950, ch. 241, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1954, ch. 360, § 27; Laws, 1956, ch. 198; Laws, 1957 Ex Sess, ch 13, § 5; Laws, 1966, ch. 293, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 284; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess ch. 14, § 11, eff from and after October 1, 1989.

§ 19-9-5.
Limitation of indebtedness.

No county shall hereafter issue bonds secured by a pledge of its full faith and credit for the purposes authorized by law in an amount which, when added to the then outstanding bonds of such county, shall exceed either (a) fifteen percent (15%) of the assessed value of the taxable property within such county according to the last completed assessment for taxation, or (b) fifteen percent (15%) of the assessment upon which taxes were levied for its fiscal year ending September 30, 1984, whichever is greater.

However, any county in the state which shall have experienced washed-out or collapsed bridges on the public roads of the county for any cause or reason may hereafter issue bonds for bridge purposes as now authorized by law in an amount which, when added to the then outstanding general obligation bonds of such county, shall not exceed either (a) twenty percent (20%) of the assessed value of the taxable property within such county according to the last completed assessment for taxation or (b) fifteen percent (15%) of the assessment upon which taxes were levied for its fiscal year ending September 30, 1984, whichever is greater.

Provided further, in computing such indebtedness, there may be deducted all bonds or other evidences of indebtedness heretofore or hereafter issued, for the construction of hospitals, ports or other capital improvements which are payable primarily from the net revenue to be generated from such hospital, port or other capital improvement, which revenue shall be pledged to the retirement of such bonds or other evidences of indebtedness, together with the full faith and credit of the county. However, in no case shall any county contract any indebtedness payable in whole or in part from proceeds of ad valorem taxes which, when added to all of the outstanding general obligation indebtedness, both bonded and floating, shall exceed either (a) twenty percent (20%) of the assessed value of all taxable property within such county according to the last completed assessment for taxation, or (b) fifteen percent (15%) of the assessment upon which taxes were levied for its fiscal year ending September 30, 1984, whichever is greater. Nothing herein contained shall be construed to apply to contract obligations in any form heretofore or hereafter incurred by any county which are subject to annual appropriations therefor, or to bonds heretofore or hereafter issued by any county for school purposes, or to bonds issued by any county under the provisions of Sections 57-1-1 through 57-1-51, or to any indebtedness incurred under Section 55-23-8, or to bonds issued under Section 57-75-37 or to any other indebtedness incurred under 57-75-37(4).

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2926-03; Laws, 1932, ch. 235; Laws, 1950, ch. 241, § 3; Laws, 1962, ch. 245, § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 495; Laws, 1982, ch. 347, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 476, § 1; Laws, 1987, ch. 424, § 1; Laws, 1989, ch. 499, § 2; Laws, 1992, ch. 499 § 2; Laws, 1995, ch. 526, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 419, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 602, § 11; Laws, 2005, ch. 315, § 11; Laws, 2016, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 19, eff from and after passage (approved Feb. 8, 2016).

§ 19-9-7.
Details of county bonds; supplemental powers conferred in issuance of bonds.

All such bonds shall be lithographed or engraved, and printed in two (2) or more colors, to prevent counterfeiting, and shall be in sums not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) each, and shall be registered as issued, be numbered in a regular series from one (1) upward, and every such bond shall specify on its face the purpose for which it was issued and the total amount authorized to be issued, and each shall be made payable to bearer, and interest shall be evidenced by proper coupons thereto attached.

Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this section, bonds referred to hereinabove may be issued pursuant to the supplemental powers and authorizations conferred by the provisions of the Registered Bond Act, being Sections 31-21-1 through 31-21-7.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2926-04; Laws, 1950, ch. 241, § 4; Laws, 1966, ch. 294, § 1; Laws, 1983, ch. 494, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved April 11, 1983).

§ 19-9-9.
Levy of special tax.

The board of supervisors of such county shall annually levy a special tax upon all of the taxable property within the county, which tax shall be sufficient to provide for the payment of the principal of and the interest on such bonds according to the terms thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2926-04; Laws, 1950, ch. 241, § 4; Laws, 1966, ch. 294, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 13, 1966).

§ 19-9-11.
Notice of intention to issue bonds; calling of election.

Before issuing any bonds for any of the purposes enumerated in Sections 19-9-1, 19-9-3, the board of supervisors shall adopt a resolution declaring its intention so to do, stating the amount of bonds proposed to be issued and the purpose for which the bonds are to be issued, and the date upon which the board proposes to direct the issuance of such bonds. Such resolution shall be published once a week for at least three consecutive weeks in at least one newspaper published in such county. The first publication of such resolution shall be made not less than twenty-one days prior to the date fixed in such resolution for the issuance of the bonds, and the last publication shall be made not more than seven days prior to such date. If no newspaper be published in such county, then such notice shall be given by publishing the resolution for the required time in some newspaper having a general circulation in such county and, in addition, by posting a copy of such resolution for at least twenty-one days next preceding the date fixed therein at three public places in such county. If twenty per cent (20%), or fifteen hundred (1500), whichever is less, of the qualified electors of the county, supervisors district, or road district, as the case may be, shall file a written protest against the issuance of such bonds on or before the date specified in such resolution, then an election on the question of the issuance of such bonds shall be called and held as is provided in Sections 19-9-13, 19-9-15. If no such protest be filed, then such bonds may be issued without an election on the question of the issuance thereof, at any time within a period of two years after the date specified in the above mentioned resolution. However, the board of supervisors, in its discretion, may nevertheless call an election on such question, in which event it shall not be necessary to publish the resolution declaring its intention to issue such bonds as herein provided.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 312; 1906, § 333; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3706; 1930, § 249; 1942, § 2926-05; Laws, 1924, ch. 236; Laws, 1932, ch. 198; Laws, 1950, ch. 241, § 5, ch. 279, § 1; Laws, 1955 Ex Sess ch. 30; Laws, 1971, ch. 479, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 31, 1971).

§ 19-9-13.
Notice of election.

Where an election is to be called, as provided in Section 19-9-11, notice of such election shall be signed by the clerk of the board of supervisors and shall be published once a week for at least three consecutive weeks, in at least one newspaper published in such county. The first publication of such notice shall be made not less than twenty-one days prior to the date fixed for such election, and the last publication shall be made not more than seven days prior to such date. If no newspaper is published in such county, then such notice shall be given by publishing the same for the required time in some newspaper having a general circulation in such county and, in addition, by posting a copy of such notice for at least twenty-one days next preceding such election at three public places in such county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2926-06; Laws, 1950, ch. 241, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 19-9-15.
Holding of election.

Such election shall be held, as far as is practicable, in the same manner as other elections are held in counties. At such election, all qualified electors of such county may vote, and the ballots used at such election shall have printed thereon a brief statement of the amount and purpose of the proposed bond issue and the words “FOR THE BOND ISSUE” and “AGAINST THE BOND ISSUE,” and the voter shall vote by placing a cross (X) or check mark (Π) opposite his choice on the proposition.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2926-07; Laws, 1950, ch. 241, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 19-9-17.
Results of election.

When the results of the election on the question of the issuance of such bonds shall have been canvassed by the election commissioners of such county and certified by them to the board of supervisors of such county, it shall be the duty of such board of supervisors to determine and adjudicate whether or not three-fifths (3/5) of the qualified electors who voted in such election voted in favor of the issuance of such bonds. Unless three-fifths (3/5) of the qualified electors who voted in such election shall have voted in favor of the issuance of such bonds, then such bonds shall not be issued. Should three-fifths (3/5) of the qualified electors who vote in such election vote in favor of the issuance of such bonds, then the board of supervisors of the county may issue such bonds, either in whole or in part, within two years from the date of such election or within two years after the final favorable termination of any litigation affecting the issuance of such bonds, as such board shall deem best.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2926-08; Laws, 1950, ch. 241, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 19-9-19.
Maturities, interest, and signatures.

All bonds issued by a county shall mature annually, with all maturities not longer than twenty (20) years, with not less than one-fiftieth (1/50) of the total issue to mature each year during the first five (5) years of the life of such bonds, not less than one-twenty-fifth (1/25) of the total issue to mature each year during the succeeding ten-year period of the life of such bonds, and the remainder to be amortized, as to principal and interest, into approximately equal annual payments, one (1) payment to mature each year for the remaining life of such bonds. However, in cases where bonds shall be issued or dated subsequent to the date fixed for making the county tax levy in the year in which such bonds are to be issued, the first maturity date of not less than one-fiftieth (1/50) of the total issue, may be fixed for any period not exceeding two (2) years from the date of the bonds with the same schedule of subsequent maturities as hereinabove set forth. Such bonds shall not bear a greater overall maximum interest rate to maturity than that allowed in Section 75-17-101, Mississippi Code of 1972. No bond shall bear more than one (1) rate of interest; each bond shall bear interest from its date to its stated maturity date at the interest rate specified in the bid; all bonds of the same maturity shall bear the same rate of interest from date to maturity; all interest accruing on such bonds so issued shall be payable semiannually or annually, except that the first interest coupon attached to any such bond may be for any period not exceeding one (1) year.

No interest payment shall be evidenced by more than one (1) coupon and neither cancelled nor supplemental coupons shall be permitted; the lowest interest rate specified for any bonds issued shall not be less than seventy percent (70%) of the highest interest rate specified for the same bond issue. The interest rate of any one (1) interest coupon shall not exceed the maximum interest rate allowed on such bonds.

Each interest rate specified in any bid must be in multiples of one-eighth of one percent (1/8 of 1%) or in multiples of one-tenth of one percent (1/10 of 1%), and a zero rate of interest cannot be named. The denomination, form, and place, or places, of payment of such bonds shall be fixed in the resolution or order of the board of supervisors issuing such bonds. Such bonds shall be executed by the manual or facsimile signature of the president of the board of supervisors, or the vice president in the absence or disability of the president, and countersigned by the manual or facsimile signature of the clerk thereof, with the official seal of the county affixed thereto. At least one (1) signature on each bond shall be a manual signature, as specified in the issuing resolution. The coupons may bear only the facsimile signatures of such president, or vice president and clerk. No bonds shall be issued and sold under the provisions of sections 19-9-1 to 19-9-31 for less than par and accrued interest.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2926-09; Laws, 1950, ch. 241, § 9; Laws, 1958, ch. 208; Laws, 1959 Ex Sess ch. 22, § 6; Laws, 1970, ch. 315, § 1; Laws, 1975, ch. 432; Laws, 1976, ch. 476; Laws, 1980, ch. 490, § 1; Laws, 1981, ch. 455, § 1; Laws, 1982, ch. 434, § 1; Laws, 1983, ch. 541, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved April 25, 1983).

§ 19-9-21.
Proceeds shall not be diverted.

The proceeds of any bonds issued by a county shall be placed in the county treasury or depository, if there be one, as a special fund, and shall be used for no other purpose than that for which such bonds were authorized to be issued. If the board of supervisors of such county, or any member thereof, or any other officer, shall wilfully divert or aid or assist in diverting any such fund, or any part thereof, to any purpose other than that for which such bonds were authorized to be issued, then such person shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment in the state penitentiary for a term not exceeding five years and, in addition, he shall be liable personally and on his official bond for the amount so diverted. Any member of such board of supervisors may escape the penalty provided for above by requesting and having his vote recorded in the negative on any illegal diversion of the proceeds of such bonds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2926-10; Laws, 1950, ch. 241, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 19-9-23.
Transfer of residue of bond proceeds.

Whenever a balance shall remain of the proceeds of any bond issue after the purpose for which such bonds were issued shall have been accomplished, such balance shall forthwith be transferred to the bond and interest fund applicable to such bond issue.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2926-11; Laws, 1950, ch. 241, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 19-9-25.
Bond and interest funds may be used to buy outstanding bonds.

Whenever there shall be on hand in any bond and interest fund an amount in excess of the amount which will be required for expenditure therefrom within the next succeeding twelve months, the board of supervisors may use such excess amount to purchase the outstanding bonds of the county which are payable from such fund whenever, in the judgment of such board the best interest of the county would be served thereby. When such bonds are purchased, they shall be cancelled and retired and shall not thereafter be resold or reissued.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2926-12; Laws, 1950, ch. 241, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 19-9-27.
Borrowing in anticipation of taxes.

The board of supervisors of any county may borrow money in anticipation of taxes for the purpose of defraying the expenses of such county, and may issue negotiable notes of the county therefor, to mature not later than April 1 of the year succeeding the year in which they are issued. The amount of money herein authorized to be borrowed shall not be in excess of twenty-five percent (25%) of the estimated amount of taxes collected and to be collected under the last preceding annual tax levies for the particular fund for which said money is borrowed. The board of supervisors may borrow said money, as hereinbefore provided, from any available fund in the county treasury, or from any other source, and such loan shall be repaid in the manner herein provided. The notes herein authorized shall bear interest at a rate to be fixed by the board, not to exceed that allowed in Section 75-17-105, Mississippi Code of 1972, and such notes shall be payable at any place to be named by the board of supervisors. Any notes or obligations issued in excess of the amount authorized to be issued under the provisions of this section shall be void. Money may be borrowed in anticipation of ad valorem taxes under the provisions of this section, regardless of whether or not such borrowing shall create an indebtedness in excess of statutory limitations.

For the payment of such loan, the board of supervisors shall either pledge the levy of a special tax each year sufficient to pay the amount borrowed for use that year, with interest, or shall pledge that such notes shall be paid out of the first money collected from taxes for the year in which they are issued. The aforesaid special tax, if necessary, may be in excess of the rate of taxation otherwise limited by law. The notes herein authorized shall not be issued until the board of supervisors shall have published notice of its intention to issue same; said notice to be published once each week for three (3) weeks in some newspaper having a general circulation in such county, but not less than twenty-one (21) days, nor more than sixty (60) days, intervening between the time of the first notice and the meeting at which said board proposes to issue such notes. If, within the time of giving notice, twenty percent (20%), of fifteen hundred (1500), whichever is less, of the qualified electors of the county shall protest or file a petition against the issuance of such notes, then such notes shall not be issued unless authorized by a three-fifths (3/5) majority of the qualified electors of such county, voting at an election to be called and held for that purpose.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 313; 1906, § 334; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3707; 1930, § 251; 1942, § 2926-13; Laws, 1904, ch. 133; Laws, 1920, ch. 227; Laws, 1950, ch. 241, § 13; Laws, 1971, ch. 479, § 2; Laws, 1981, ch. 462, § 1; Laws, 1982, ch. 434, § 2; Laws, 1983, ch. 541, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved April 25, 1983).

§ 19-9-28.
Borrowing in anticipation of receipt of funds from confirmed federal or state grants or loans.

Any county that shall have received a binding commitment from the United States of America, or any agency thereof, or the State of Mississippi, or any agency thereof, for a grant or loan may borrow money in anticipation or receipt of funds from such confirmed grant or loan unless prohibited by federal or state law or by the terms of the agreement concerning such grant or loan and may assign and pledge as security for such interim financing the proceeds of any such grant or loan. The board of supervisors may borrow said money, as hereinbefore provided, from any available fund in the county treasury, excepting the funds or accounts described in Sections 27-39-323 and 27-39-329(2)(b), or may borrow said money from any other source, and such loan shall be repaid from the first available federal funds received by the county in the manner and subject to the same terms as herein provided.

Such interim financing shall be upon such terms and conditions as may be agreed upon by the issuing county and the party advancing such interim funds or the purchaser of the obligations evidencing such indebtedness; provided, however, that the principal on any such loan, including interfund loans, shall be repaid within a reasonable time after receipt of funds from the United States of America, or from the State of Mississippi, or any agency thereof, the anticipation of which gave rise to said interim financing, and provided that the interest rate on such interim financing shall not exceed that allowed in Section 75-17-107, Mississippi Code of 1972.

In borrowing money under the provisions hereof, it shall not be necessary to publish notice of intention so to do or to secure the consent of the qualified electors, either by election or otherwise. Such borrowing may be authorized by resolution of the board of supervisors of the issuing county and may be evidenced by a negotiable note or notes in such form as may be prescribed in such resolution. The indebtedness incurred under this section shall not be considered when computing any limitation of indebtedness of the issuing county established by law.

Such borrowing, whether or not evidenced by a negotiable note or notes, may be placed or sold at public or private sale for such price and in such manner and from time to time as may be determined by the issuing county and the issuing county may pay all expenses, premiums and commissions which its board of supervisors may deem necessary or advantageous in connection with the issuance thereof.

Such borrowing shall be limited to the sum of: (a) the amount of the confirmed grant or loan; (b) the amount of interest payable on such interim financing; and (c) the reasonable cost of incurring such indebtedness or issuing the note or notes evidencing such indebtedness. All moneys borrowed under the authority of this section, including any interfund loans, shall be secured by and repaid from the grant or loan proceeds, earnings on the investment of the grant or loan proceeds and the proceeds of the interim financing, and from any other proceeds, revenues or earnings received by the issuing county in connection with such grant or loan or with the interim financing, and may be further secured by and repaid from available revenues of a county-owned utility.

In the event grant or loan proceeds pledged to the repayment of the interim financing have not been received in time to pay at maturity all or a portion of the principal of and interest on the indebtedness incurred pursuant to this section, the issuing county may borrow additional moneys pursuant to this section in anticipation of the aforesaid grant or loan proceeds in order to pay at maturity the outstanding principal and interest on the indebtedness previously incurred, provided that the indebtedness originally incurred shall be promptly repaid upon receipt of proceeds of such subsequent borrowings. The issuing county may enter into agreements with one or more lenders obligating such lenders to provide such additional financing upon such terms and conditions as may be agreed upon by the issuing county and the lenders.

This section, without reference to any other statute, when dealing with grant or loan anticipation notes, shall be deemed to be full and complete authority for the borrowing of such funds and the issuance of a note or notes to evidence such indebtedness, and shall be construed as an additional and alternative method therefor, and none of the present restrictions, requirements, conditions or limitations of law applicable to the issuance or sale of bonds, notes or other obligations by the issuing county in this state shall apply to the borrowing of funds under this section, and no proceedings shall be required for the borrowing of such funds other than registration and those provided for and required herein, and all powers necessary to be exercised in order to carry out the provisions of this section are hereby conferred.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 493, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1977, ch. 427; Laws, 1980, ch. 473, § 2; Laws, 1982, ch. 451, § 1; Laws, 1983, ch. 541, § 7; Laws, 1985, ch. 514, § 3, eff from and after October 1, 1985.

§ 19-9-29.
Investment of surplus funds.

Whenever any county shall have on hand any bond and interest funds, any funds derived from the sale of bonds, special funds, or any other funds in excess of the sums which will be required to meet the current needs and demands of no more than seven (7) business days, the board of supervisors of such county shall invest such excess funds in the following manner:

Such excess funds shall be invested for periods of from fourteen (14) days to one (1) year in interest-bearing time certificates of deposit with or through county depositories serving in accordance with Section 27-105-303 which are willing to accept the same, at a negotiated rate of interest. The negotiated rate of interest shall be at the highest rate possible at the date of purchase or investment for such time certificates of deposit or interest-bearing accounts, but such rate of interest shall not be less than the rate of interest paid to the general public on passbook savings. The rate of interest established herein shall be the minimum rate of interest and there shall be no maximum rate of interest.

The balance, if any, of such excess funds shall be invested in interest-bearing time certificates of deposit for the same maturity periods and at the same rate of interest as prescribed in paragraph (a) of this section in or through state depositories located in such county which are willing to accept the same, to the same extent as such depositories are eligible for invested state funds.

To the extent that the board of supervisors finds that such excess funds cannot be invested pursuant to paragraphs (a) and (b) of this section for the stated maturity of from fourteen (14) days to one (1) year, the board of supervisors may invest such funds in any bonds or other direct obligations of the United States of America, the State of Mississippi, or any county, municipality or school district of this state, if such county, municipal or school district bonds have been approved by a reputable bond attorney or have been validated by a decree of the chancery court, or the board of supervisors may invest such funds, together with any other funds required for current operation, in obligations issued or guaranteed in full as to principal and interest by the United States of America which are subject to a repurchase agreement with a county or state depository, or the board of supervisors may deposit such funds in interest-bearing accounts with a county or state depository. Such bonds or obligations purchased may have any maturity date, provided that they shall mature or be redeemable prior to the time that the funds so invested will be needed for expenditure.

Any excess funds invested in certificates of deposit or interest-bearing accounts with county or state depositories under this section shall be secured in the manner required by Section 27-105-315. The proceeds of such certificates of deposit shall be immediately reinvested on the date of maturity in accordance with paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of this section, unless the board of supervisors determines that such funds are required for current operation.

When bonds or other obligations have been purchased, the same may be sold or surrendered for redemption at any time, except certificates of deposit which must mature, by order or resolution of such board of supervisors. The president of the board of supervisors, when authorized by such order or resolution, shall have the power and authority to execute all instruments and take such other action as may be necessary to effectuate the sale or redemption thereof. When such bonds or other obligations are sold or redeemed, the proceeds thereof, including accrued interest thereon, shall be paid into the same fund as that from which the investment was made and shall in all respects be dealt with as are other monies in such fund. Except as hereinafter provided, any interest derived from the investments authorized in this section may, as an alternative, be deposited into the general fund of the county. Any interest derived from the investment of sums received under the terms of the federal State and Local Fiscal Assistance Act of 1972, and any subsequent revisions or reenactments of that act, shall be paid into the same fund as that from which the investment was made. Any interest derived from the investment of school bond funds shall be handled as provided in Section 37-59-43. Any interest derived from investment of other bond proceeds or from investment of any bond and interest fund, bond reserve fund or bond redemption sinking fund shall be deposited either in the same fund from which the investment was made or in the bond and interest fund established for payment of the principal or interest on the bonds. Any interest derived from special purpose funds which are outside the function of general county government shall be paid into that special purpose fund.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2926-14; Laws, 1950, ch. 241, § 14; Laws, 1970, ch. 316, § 1; Laws, 1977, ch. 426, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 514, § 16; Laws, 1995, ch. 567, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 426, § 1; brought forward without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 413, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 19-9-31.
Exclusiveness of procedure.

No interest-bearing indebtedness shall hereafter be incurred by any county except in the manner provided by Sections 19-9-1 through 19-9-31 or as may otherwise be provided by law.

The authority provided for the issuance of bonds for hospitals and related subjects by Sections 41-13-15 through 41-13-53 Mississippi Code of 1972, shall not be affected by the provisions of Sections 19-9-1 through 19-9-31, and the authority herein conferred relative to hospitals and related subjects shall be in addition thereto.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 2926-15, 2926-16; Laws, 1950, ch. 241, §§ 15, 16, eff from and after July 1, 1950.